Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Tampering With or Alteration of Odometers

§ 63-7-201.
Definitions.

As used in Sections 63-7-201 through 63-7-209:

The term “dealer” means any person who has sold five (5) or more motor vehicles in the past twelve (12) months to purchasers who in good faith purchased such vehicles for purposes other than resale.

The term “distributor” means any person who has sold five (5) or more motor vehicles in the past twelve (12) months for resale.

The term “odometer” means an instrument for measuring and recording the actual distance a motor vehicle travels while in operation; but shall not include any auxiliary odometer designed to be reset by the operator of the motor vehicle for the purpose of recording mileage on trips.

The term “repair and replacement” means to restore to a sound working condition by replacing the odometer or any part thereof or by correcting what is inoperative.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 489, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 63-7-203.
Offenses.

It shall be unlawful for any person to advertise for sale, to sell, to use, or to install on any part of a motor vehicle or on an odometer in a motor vehicle any device which causes the odometer to register any mileage other than the true mileage driven. For the purposes of this section the true mileage driven is that mileage driven by the car as registered by the odometer within the manufacturer’s designed tolerance.

It shall be unlawful for any person with the intent to defraud to operate a motor vehicle on any street or highway knowing that the odometer of such vehicle is disconnected or nonfunctional.

It shall be unlawful for any person to disconnect, turn back, reset or alter, or cause to be disconnected, reset or altered, the odometer of any motor vehicle with the intent to reduce the number of miles indicated thereon.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 489, §§ 2-4, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 63-7-205.
Warranty relating to odometer mileage.

If a manufacturer, distributor, or dealer of a new motor vehicle makes any warranty to the purchaser of, and with respect to, a new motor vehicle which is based on the amount of miles that the motor vehicle is driven, only those miles which the motor vehicle has been driven on and after the date that the motor vehicle has first been sold as new to the purchaser shall be considered for purposes of the warranty.

The mileage indicated upon the odometer of the motor vehicle on the date that the motor vehicle is first sold as new to the purchaser shall, for the purposes of the warranty, be the mileage upon which the warranty shall commence.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 489, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 63-7-207.
Service, repair or replacement of odometer.

Nothing in Sections 63-7-201 through 63-7-209 shall prevent the service, repair, or replacement of an odometer, provided the mileage indicated thereon remains the same as before the service, repair, or replacement. Where the odometer is incapable of registering the same mileage as before such service, repair, or replacement, the odometer shall be adjusted to read zero and a notice in writing shall be attached to the left door frame of the vehicle by the owner or his agent specifying the mileage prior to repair or replacement of the odometer and the date on which it was repaired or replaced. Any removal or alteration of such notice so affixed shall be unlawful.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 489, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1979.

§ 63-7-209.
Penalties.

Violation of the provisions of Sections 63-7-201 through 63-7-209 shall be deemed a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punishable by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months or by both such fine and imprisonment.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1979, ch. 489, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1979.